Utah statutes.
53A-2-402.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Eligible entity" means:

(a)  a city or town with a population density of 3,000 or more people per square mile; or

(b)  a county whose unincorporated area includes a qualifying township.

(2)  "Purchase price" means the greater of:

(a)  an amount that is the average of:

(i)  the appraised value of the surplus property, based on the predominant zone in the surrounding area, as indicated in an appraisal obtained by the eligible entity; and

(ii)  the appraised value of the surplus property, based on the predominant zone in the surrounding area, as indicated in an appraisal obtained by the school district; and

(b)  the amount the school district paid to acquire the surplus property.

(3)  "Qualifying township" means a township under Section 17-27a-306 that has a population density of 3,000 or more people per square mile within the boundaries of the township.

(4)  "Surplus property" means land owned by a school district that:

(a)  was purchased with taxpayer money;

(b)  is located within a city or town that is an eligible entity or within a qualifying township;

(c)  consists of one contiguous tract at least three acres in size; and

(d)  has been declared by the school district to be surplus.

